Tennessee, session 114, SB2655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-25-1104, is amended by deleting
"ten (10) years" from subsection (a) and subdivision (b)(2)(A) and substituting "one hundred
(100) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2655
011550
- 1 -